Hawaii statutes.
§487J-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Affiliated" means businesses or
persons who have contractual arrangements with, or are subject to the control
of, the pharmacy benefit manager.

"Business" means a sole
proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, association, or any other form of business entity. The term
also includes a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a
license or authorization certificate under the laws of this State, any other
state, the United States, or any other country, or the parent or the subsidiary
of any such financial institution. The term also includes an entity whose
business is records destruction.

"Employee benefit plan" means any
plan as defined in title 29 United States Code section 1002(3), as amended.

"Government agency" means any
department, division, board, commission, public corporation, or other agency or
instrumentality of the State or of any county.

"Health benefits plan" has the same
meaning as in section 87A-1.

"Health information" has the same
meaning as in 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, as may be
amended.

"Managed care plan" has the same
meaning as in section 432E-1.

"Marketing" means making a
communication about a product or service that encourages a recipient of the
communication to purchase or use the product or service.

"Personal information" has the same
meaning as in section 487N-1.

"Redacted" means the rendering of
data so that it is unreadable or is truncated so that no more than the last
four digits of the identification number are accessible as part of the data.

"Pharmacy benefit manager" means any
person, business, or entity that performs pharmacy benefit management,
including but not limited to a person or entity under contract with a pharmacy
benefit manager to perform pharmacy benefit management on behalf of a managed
care company, nonprofit hospital or medical service organization, insurance
company, third-party payor, or health program administered by the State.

"Scan" or "scanning" means
to access the machine-readable zone of an individual's Hawaii identification
card or driver's license with an electronic device capable of deciphering, in
an electronically readable format, information electronically encoded on an
individual's Hawaii identification card or driver's license. [L 2006, c 137, pt
of §2; am L Sp 2008, c 10, §3; am L 2012, c 191, §2; am L 2013, c 225, §3]

Note

The 2013 amendment applies to all plans and contracts issued,
renewed, modified, altered, or amended on or after June 27, 2013. L 2013, c
225, §5.

Revision Note

In this section, "pharmacy benefit manager"
substituted for "pharmacy benefits manager" and "pharmacy
benefit management" substituted for "pharmacy benefits
management".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next